Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2152
Inconsistent laws; superseded.

All laws and parts of laws of this state inconsistent with the Insurance Holding Company System Act shall be superseded with respect to matters covered by the act.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 32.